Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4272.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 CHAPTER XVII Sec. 11e. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapters 169 to 199 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 169.224b Pub trst H Campaign finance ? independent expenditure committee contributions 3 169.227 Pub trst H Campaign finance ? independent committee contributions 3 169.233 Pub trst H Campaign finance ? failure to file certain campaign statements 3 169.254 Pub trst H Campaign finance ? corporate contributions 3 169.255 Pub trst H Campaign finance ? corporate solicitation for certain funds 3 169.266 Pub trst H Campaign finance ? qualified campaign expenditures 3 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S02297'25) or House Bill No. 4271 (request no. H02297'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.